Hawaii statutes.
[§36-29.5] Transfer from boating special
fund. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including section 36-27,
there shall be deducted from time to time by the director of finance for the
purpose of defraying the prorated estimate of central service expenses of
government in relation to the boating special fund, five per cent of all
receipts and deposits in the boating special fund after subtracting therefrom
any amounts pledged, charged, or encumbered for the payment of bonds or
interest thereon during the time period for which the deduction is to be made.
The deductions shall be transferred to the general fund of the State and shall
become general realizations of the State.

For the purpose of this section, the term
"any amounts pledged, charged, or encumbered for the payment of bonds or
interest thereon" shall include:

(1) Amounts that are so pledged, charged, or
encumbered; and

(2) Amounts required by law to be paid from the
boating special fund into the general fund of the State to reimburse the general
fund for bond requirements for general obligation bonds issued for boating
facility purposes.

The chairperson of the board of land and
natural resources shall cooperate with the director of finance in effecting the
transfer. [L 2000, c 47, §1]

Cross References

Boating special fund, see §248-8.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next